Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.528

Delegation of powers and duties by governing boards.

The governing boards of institutions of higher education shall have power, when exercised by resolution, to delegate to the president or his or her designee, of their respective university or college, any of the powers and duties vested in or imposed upon such governing board by law. Delegated powers and duties may be exercised in the name of the respective governing boards.

[ 2011 c 336 s 712; 1971 ex.s. c 57 s 21.]